Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB562.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5085YC (2) 91 th/ns H.F. _____ Section 1. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION ââ STUDY COMMITTEE 1 ââ FEASIBILITY OF IMPLEMENTING WILDLIFE CROSSINGS AT HIGHWAY 2 LOCATIONS. 3 1. The department of transportation shall convene a 4 study committee to produce a report on the feasibility of 5 implementing wildlife crossings at certain highway locations 6 with high rates of vehicle crashes involving animals. The 7 department of transportation shall file the study committeeâs 8 report with the general assembly on or before January 11, 2027. 9 2. The membership of the study committee shall consist of 10 all of the following persons or that personâs designee: 11 a. The director of transportation. 12 b. The director of the department of natural resources. 13 c. The director of the institute for transportation at Iowa 14 state university of science and technology. 15 3. The study committeeâs report must include all of the 16 following: 17 a. A data-driven ranking of the highway locations in Iowa 18 with the highest number of vehicle crashes involving animals. 19 Such data must be derived from information the committee 20 gathers including statistics regarding average highway traffic 21 volume, animal carcass removals, vehicle crash reports for 22 crashes involving an animal, animal habitat and migration data, 23 and any other data the committee deems relevant. The ranking 24 of highway locations must include adjustments for unreported 25 vehicle crashes involving animals. 26 b. Recommendations to the general assembly on implementing 27 countermeasures to reduce the frequency of vehicle crashes 28 involving animals at specific highway locations, or within 29 specific highway corridors, including but not limited to 30 constructing highway overpasses or underpasses, and adding or 31 improving fencing along the highway. 32 c. Preliminary costs and crash-reduction estimates, 33 including benefit-to-cost ratios using the latest cost-benefit 34 analysis parameters. 35 -1- LSB 5085YC (2) 91 th/ns 1/ 2 H.F. _____ d. A grant request strategy and timeline aligned to 1 applicable federal funding schedules, including for grants 2 awarded by the United States department of transportation, 3 through the federal highway administration for the wildlife 4 crossings pilot program. 5 4. The study committee shall adopt reporting milestones and 6 data standards to utilize while studying the feasibility of 7 implementing wildlife crossings at certain highway locations. 8 The department of transportation shall make available on 9 the departmentâs internet site a study committee dashboard 10 so members of the public can follow the study committeeâs 11 progress. 12 5. This section is repealed July 1, 2027. 13